District of Columbia statutes.
7-743.02

Advisory Committee on Acupuncture.

(a)

There is established an Advisory Committee on Acupuncture to consist of 5 members as follows:

(1)

The Director of the Department of Health, or his or her designee;

(2)

Three non-physician acupuncturists licensed in the District;

(3)

A consumer member.

(b)

Of the appointees to the Advisory Committee on Acupuncture other than the Director, 2 shall serve an initial term of 2 years and 2 shall serve an initial term of 3 years. Subsequent appointments shall be for terms of 3 years.

(c)

(1)

The Advisory Committee on Acupuncture shall develop and submit to the Board of Medicine guidelines for licensing acupuncturists and regulating the practice of acupuncture in the District.

(2)

(A)

Guidelines approved by the Board of Medicine under § 3-1202.03 shall remain in effect until revised guidelines are submitted to and approved by the Board of Medicine.

(B)

The Advisory Committee on Acupuncture shall submit revised guidelines to the Board of Medicine by June 22, 2015.

(3)

The Advisory Committee on Acupuncture shall meet at least annually to review guidelines and make necessary revisions for submission to the Board of Medicine.

Oct. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 14-28, § 4942
as added May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, § 202(b), 62 DCR 1884

History